Hawaii statutes.
[§338-55] Disposition of body;
armed forces service members. The person designated by the decedent as
authorized to direct disposition on a United States Department of Defense
Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or its successor form, may arrange for the
final disposition of the decedent's body, including cremation, if the decedent:

(1) Died while serving in any branch of the United
States armed forces, United States reserve forces, or National Guard; and

(2) Executed the United States Department of Defense
Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or its successor form. [L 2011, c 71, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next